Vermont, session 2025-2026, H284.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vision Test Requirements * * *
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 632 is amended to read:
§ 632. EXAMINATION REQUIRED; WAIVER
(a) Before an operator’s or a junior operator’s license is issued to an
applicant for the first time in this State, or before a renewal license is issued to
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 2 of 15
an applicant whose previous Vermont license had expired more than three
years prior to the application for renewal, the applicant shall pass a satisfactory
examination, except that the Commissioner may, in his or her the
Commissioner’s discretion, waive the examination when the applicant holds a
chauffeur’s or operator’s license in force at the time of application or within
three years prior to the application in some other jurisdiction where an
examination is required similar to the examination required in this State.
(b) The examination shall consist of:
(1) an oral or written examination;
(2) a thorough road test; and
(3) at the discretion of the Commissioner, such other examination or
demonstration as he or she the Commissioner may prescribe, including an oral
eye examination.
(c) An applicant may have an individual of his or her the applicant’s
choosing at the oral examination or road test to serve as an interpreter,
including to translate any oral commands given as part of the road test.
(d) Before a renewal license is issued to an applicant 70 years of age or
older, the applicant must appear in person at a Department location and pass a
vision test.
* * * Requirements to Operate a Motor Home * * *
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 3 of 15
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. DEFINITIONS
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, and unless the context
otherwise requires in statutes relating to motor vehicles and enforcement of the
law regulating vehicles, as provided in this title and 20 V.S.A. part 5, the
following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(89) “Motor home” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 8902(11).
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. LICENSE REQUIRED
* * *
(d)(1)(A) The Commissioner may, in his or her the Commissioner’s
discretion, determine that certain types of motor vehicles require that an
operator possess specialized skill or knowledge to operate those vehicles so
that the public safety may not be endangered. If the Commissioner so
determines, he or she the Commissioner may prescribe different classes of
licenses or endorsements for the operation of particular types of vehicles.
(B) The Commissioner is authorized to make rules prescribing forms
and procedures for applications, license classifications, restrictions,
endorsements, examinations, driver training requirements, and
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 4 of 15
disqualifications consistent with this title as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided pursuant to this title, a person shall not
operate a motor home weighing at least 10,000 pounds and not more than
26,000 pounds unless the person holds a valid motor home endorsement issued
by the State.
* * *
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 608 is amended to read:
§ 608. FEES
* * *
(b) An additional fee of $4.00 per year shall be paid for a motorcycle or
motor home endorsement. The endorsement may be obtained for either a two-
year or four-year period, to be coincidental with the length of the operator’s
license.
Sec. 5. 23 V.S.A. § 615 is amended to read:
§ 615. UNLICENSED OPERATORS
(a)(1)(A) An unlicensed person 15 years of age or older may operate a
motor vehicle if he or she the unlicensed person possesses a valid learner’s
permit issued to him or her the unlicensed person by the Commissioner, or by
another jurisdiction in accordance with section 208 of this title, and if one of
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 5 of 15
the following persons who is not under the influence of alcohol or drugs rides
beside him or her the unlicensed person:
* * *
(3) A licensed person who does not possess a valid motor home
endorsement may operate a motor home weighing at least 10,000 pounds and
not more than 26,000 pounds, with no passengers, only during daylight hours
and then only if the person has in their possession a valid motor home learner’s
permit issued to the person by the Commissioner.
* * *
Sec. 6. 23 V.S.A. § 617 is amended to read:
§ 617. LEARNER’S PERMIT
* * *
(c)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any
licensed person may apply to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles for a
learner’s permit for the operation of a motor home weighing at least 10,000
pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds in the form prescribed by the
Commissioner. The Commissioner shall require payment of a fee of $24.00 at
the time application is made.
(2) After the applicant has successfully passed all parts of the applicable
motor home endorsement examination, other than a skill test, the
Commissioner may issue to the applicant a learner’s permit that entitles the
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 6 of 15
applicant, subject to subsection 615(a) of this title, to operate a motor home
upon the public highways for a period of 120 days from the date of issuance.
The fee for the examination shall be $11.00.
(3) A motor home learner’s permit may be renewed only twice upon
payment of a $24.00 fee. If, during the original permit period and two
renewals the permittee has not successfully passed the applicable skill test or
motor home operation training course, the permittee shall not obtain another
motor home learner’s permit for a period of 12 months from the expiration of
the permit unless the permittee has successfully completed the applicable
motor home training course.
(4) This section shall not affect section 602 of this title.
(d) No learner’s permit may be issued to any person under 18 years of age
unless the parent or guardian of, or a person standing in loco parentis to, the
applicant files his or her the person’s written consent to the issuance with the
Commissioner.
(d)(e) An applicant shall pay $24.00 to the Commissioner for each learner’s
permit or a duplicate or renewal thereof.
(e)(f)(1) A learner’s permit, which is not a learner’s permit for the
operation of a motorcycle or a motor home, shall contain a photograph or
imaged likeness of the individual if the permit is obtained in person. The
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 7 of 15
photographic learner’s permit shall be available at locations designated by the
Commissioner.
* * *
(f)(g)(1) The Commissioner may authorize motorcycle rider training
instructors to administer a motorcycle endorsement examination for three-
wheeled motorcycles only or for any motorcycle, or a motorcycle skill test for
three-wheeled motorcycles only or for any motorcycle, or any of these. Upon
successful completion of the applicable examination or test, the instructor shall
issue to the applicant either a temporary motorcycle learner’s permit or notice
of motorcycle endorsement, as appropriate. The instructor shall immediately
forward to the Commissioner the application and fee together with such any
additional information as required by the Commissioner may require.
* * *
Sec. 7. 23 V.S.A. chapter 9, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Motor Home Operator Training Program
§ 741. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Chief instructor” means a licensed motor home operator who meets
the standards established by the Department to qualify to train and oversee
instructors for the motor home operator education program.
(2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 8 of 15
(3) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(4) “Motor home” means a motor home as defined in section 4 of this
title that weighs at least 10,000 pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds.
(5) “Operator training course” means a motor home operator education
curriculum and delivery system approved by the Department as meeting
standards designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and
skills necessary for the safe operation of a motor home.
(6) “Program coordinator” means the person designated by the
Commissioner to plan, organize, and administer the Motor Home Operator
Training Program as provided in subsection 742(b) of this subchapter.
(7) “Training specialist” means the person designated by the
Commissioner to fulfill the obligations stated in subsection 742(c) of this title.
§ 742. MOTOR HOME OPERATOR TRAINING PROGRAM
(a) The Department shall establish standards for and shall administer the
Motor Home Operator Training Program. The Program shall include operator
training courses and instructor training. The Department may expand the
Program to include public awareness, alcohol and drug effects, motor home
operator improvement, licensing improvement, Program promotion, or other
motor home safety programs.
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 9 of 15
(b) The Commissioner shall appoint a Program coordinator who shall
oversee and direct the Program by setting Program and funding guidelines, and
conduct an annual evaluation.
(c) The Commissioner shall also appoint one or more training specialists
who shall assist in establishing motor home operator training courses
throughout the State, support and implement Program and funding guidelines,
and supervise instructors and other personnel as necessary. The training
specialist may be a trained chief instructor.
(d) An adequate number of motor home operator training courses shall be
provided to meet the reasonably anticipated needs of all persons in the State
who desire to participate in the Program. The Department shall issue
certificates of completion in the manner and form prescribed by the
Commissioner to persons who satisfactorily complete the requirements of the
course.
(e) The Department may enter into contracts with either public or private
institutions or organizations for technical assistance in conducting motor home
operator training courses, if the course is administered and taught according to
standards for the Program established by the Department pursuant to this
section. If necessary, an organization conducting a motor home operator
training course shall charge a reasonable tuition fee that shall be determined by
and paid to the Commissioner.
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 10 of 15
(f) The Commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this subchapter and to implement the Motor Home Operator
Training Program.
(g) In establishing standards for the Motor Home Operator Training
Program, the Department shall be guided by any existing national standards for
such programs.
(h) Any person, agency, institution, or organization offering motor home
safety instruction under the auspices of this subchapter, with respect to such
instruction activities, are exempt from the requirements of subchapter 4 of this
chapter relating to driver training school licenses.
§ 743. INSTRUCTOR REQUIREMENTS AND TRAINING
(a) The Department shall establish standards for an approved motor home
operator training instructor preparation course. Successful completion of the
course shall require the participant to demonstrate knowledge of the course
material, knowledge of safe motor home operating practices, motor home
driving proficiency, and the necessary aptitude for instructing students.
(b) The Commissioner shall establish minimum requirements for the
qualifications of a motor home operator training instructor. The minimum
requirements shall include the following:
(1) The instructor shall have a high school diploma or its equivalent.
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 11 of 15
(2) The instructor shall be at least 21 years of age and must hold a valid
operator’s license with a motor home endorsement or a valid commercial
driver’s license.
(3) The instructor’s license shall not have been suspended or revoked at
any time during the preceding two years.
(4) The instructor shall not have any convictions for driving under the
influence of alcohol or drugs during the preceding five years.
(5) If the instructor is licensed in another state, the instructor shall
furnish certified copies of the instructor’s driving records to the Department for
the preceding five years, or the maximum number of years less than five for
which the applicable state retains driving records.
(c) Temporary, seasonal employees of the Department of Motor Vehicles
hired to provide motor home safety instruction, as well as any assistant
instructors or range aides hired on a temporary, seasonal basis to provide or
assist in the provision of motor home safety instruction, shall be exempt from
the classified service established pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 13.
§ 744. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2026, all applicants for a motor home learner’s
permit or a motor home endorsement shall successfully complete the motor
home training course established under this subchapter before taking the skills
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 12 of 15
test required to obtain a motor home endorsement, unless the applicant is
exempt pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The following applicants for a motor home learner’s permit or a motor
home endorsement shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section:
(1) a renewal applicant;
(2) an applicant who surrenders a valid commercial driver’s license
from this State or any other state; and
(3) an applicant who, as determined by the Commissioner, has
successfully completed an equivalent training course in another state or
province.
Sec. 8. 23 V.S.A. § 4103 is amended to read:
§ 4103. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4)(A) “Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed or
used to transport passengers or property that:
(i) has either a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight
of at least 26,001 or more pounds or such a lesser rating as determined by
federal regulation;
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 13 of 15
(ii) is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the
driver; or
(iii) is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be
placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, subpart F; or
(iv) is a motor home as defined in 32 V.S.A. § 8902(11) that
weighs at least 26,001 pounds; a vehicle towing a trailer coach with a
combined gross vehicle weight rating of at least 26,001 pounds, or a vehicle
towing a trailer coach with a combined gross vehicle weight rating of less than
26,001 pounds where the gross vehicle weight rating of the trailer coach is
more than 10,000 pounds.
(B) “Commercial motor vehicle” shall not include:
* * *
(ii) motor homes as defined in 32 V.S.A. § 8902(11) and trailer
coaches as defined in subdivision 4(41) of this title; however, this exemption
shall only apply to vehicles used strictly for recreational, noncommercial
purposes; [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 9. 23 V.S.A. § 4111 is amended to read:
§ 4111. COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE
* * *
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 14 of 15
(b) Classifications, endorsements, and restrictions. Driver’s licenses may
be issued with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions:
(1) Licensees may drive all vehicles in the class for which the license is
issued and all lesser classes of vehicles, except those requiring special
endorsements.
* * *
(E) Class R―Any motor home with a gross vehicle weight rating of
26,001 pounds or more or any vehicle towing a trailer coach with a combined
gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 pounds or more.
(F) Class TR―Any vehicle towing a trailer coach with a combined
gross vehicle weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less where the gross vehicle
weight rating of the trailer coach is more than 10,000 pounds.
* * *
Sec. 10. IMPLEMENTATION; ADOPTION OF RULES; OUTREACH
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, not later than July 1,
2026, implement and make available the Motor Home Operator Training
Program established pursuant to Sec. 7 of this act.
(2) The Commissioner shall ensure that the Program can be operated
effectively and that there are adequate training vehicles, instructors, curriculum
materials, and training sites to provide the training throughout the State to all
those individuals who desire or would be required to complete the course.
VT LEG #379378 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.284
2025 Page 15 of 15
(b) The Commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the
provisions of Secs. 2 through 9 of this act. The rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection shall take effect not later than July 1, 2026.
(c) The Commissioner shall, not later than April 1, 2026, make available
outreach and education materials to inform drivers of the requirements of Secs.
2 through 9 of this act.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 and 10 shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(b) Secs. 2 through 9 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379378 v.1